Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-166
Postage records; requirements.

The materiel division shall keep an accurate record of the postage used
by each state officer, department, commission, board, bureau, court, or other
agency and charge such state officer, department, commission, board, bureau,
court, or other agency with the exact amount of postage so used plus administrative
and operational costs. Administrative and operational costs shall be charged
as a percentage of the amount charged for postage. Such charge shall, as nearly
as may be practical, reflect the actual administrative and operational costs
of the central mailing room and its related activities. The division shall submit electronically an annual report
to the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature of the percentage charge. Rates
planned for the coming fiscal year shall be included in the instructions for
completion of budget request forms as annually prepared by the Department
of Administrative Services' budget division. If rate revisions are required
during the fiscal year to reflect changes in the administrative and operational
costs, these revisions shall be announced to each state officer, department,
commission, board, bureau, court, or other agency at least thirty days prior
to their use.

Laws 1943, c. 218, § 3, p. 715;

R.S.1943, § 81-166;

Laws 1978, LB 961, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 9;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 19;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 165.